District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.19

No action by subcontractor against owner.

No subcontractor, materialman, or workman employed under the original contractor shall be entitled to a personal judgment or decree against the owner of the premises for the amount due to him from said original contractor, except upon a special promise of such owner, in writing, for a sufficient consideration, to be answerable for the same.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1387, ch. 854, § 1257
1981 Ed., § 38-121.
1973 Ed., § 38-121.